Georgia statutes. 
Municipal ordinance contravening usual and ordinary rights of a citizen cannot be legally passed unless the power to do so be plainly conferred by valid and competent legislative grant. Jewel Tea Co. v. City Council, 59 Ga. App. 260, 200 S.E. 503 (1938) (decided under former law).

Constitutionality of refusal to allow conduct of particular business. - Unless a business may be held to be a nuisance per se, an Act allowing a municipality to refuse the conduct of the same, irrespective of its compliance with any regulations adopted for the proper exercise of such business, is violative of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. III and Art. I, Sec. I, Para. II (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Paras. I and II). Jones v. City of Atlanta, 51 Ga. App. 218, 179 S.E. 922 (1935) (decided under former law).

No power to declare lawful business nuisance. - Municipality has no authority, by ordinance, to declare a useful and per se perfectly lawful business a nuisance, and provide for the issuance of permits by the city, which may be granted or declined in the discretion of the governing authorities. Jones v. City of Atlanta, 51 Ga. App. 218, 179 S.E. 922 (1935) (decided under former law).

Completeness of annexation statute. - There is no requirement, statutory or otherwise, that the local annexation statute itself make provisions for the myriad adjustments between the annexed territory and the municipality which the annexation necessitates. Bruck v. City of Temple, 240 Ga. 411, 240 S.E.2d 876 (1977).

Charter amendment needed to abolish city department created by home rule enactment. - City department created by a home rule enactment, once having achieved charter status, can be abolished only by another home rule charter amendment requiring advertisements in advance and adoption by the council at two consecutive regular meetings as required by paragraph (b)(1). Jackson v. Fraternal Order of Police Lodge No. 8, 234 Ga. 906, 218 S.E.2d 633 (1975).

Ordinance was properly advertised in advance by publishing synopsis of proposed amendment. Jackson v. Fraternal Order of Police Lodge No. 8, 234 Ga. 906, 218 S.E.2d 633 (1975).

Requiring corporation to give bond before transporting goods unauthorized. - City was without authority under the city's charter or the general law to require a corporation to give bond or file a policy of liability insurance as a prerequisite to transporting the corporation's goods from its place of business in an automobile, cart, wagon, or dray. Jewel Tea Co. v. City Council, 59 Ga. App. 260, 200 S.E. 503 (1938) (decided under former law).

Ordinance prohibiting blowing of train whistle. - Municipal ordinance providing without exception that no person operating a locomotive engine shall blow the whistle thereof within the corporate limits of a city is void as being unreasonable, contrary to public interest, public policy, and the general welfare of the public, when it appears without dispute that the ordinance's application at certain grade crossings within the city would prohibit the operator of a locomotive engine from giving adequate warning to persons who may be in, near, or about to enter a place of danger upon the tracks where the locomotive engine is operating. Cruise v. City of Rome, 94 Ga. App. 373, 94 S.E.2d 617 (1956) (decided under former law).

Waste removal ordinance assessing fees for the collection, removal, or disposal of solid wastes against a property owner for apartment units which were neither occupied nor habitable was not authorized by the city charter. Monticello, Ltd. v. City of Atlanta, 231 Ga. App. 382, 499 S.E.2d 157 (1998).

Claim not valid. - City did not assert a valid breach of ordinance claim arising out of a corporation's failure to pay the city additional sums that the city claimed were owed due to a natural gas billing error as: (1) in order to assert a breach of ordinance claim, the city had to show that the ordinance was validly enacted; (2) the city failed to present any evidence showing that an alleged ordinance setting natural gas billing rates was enacted in conformance with the requirements imposed under Lawrenceville, Ga., City Charter §§ 2.22, 2.29; and (3) the city's claim was, in actuality, simply a claim on an account. City of Lawrenceville v. Ricoh Elecs., Inc., 370 F. Supp. 2d 1328 (N.D. Ga. 2005).

Disregard of parliamentary rule no basis for annulment or invalidation. - While municipal governing bodies usually adopt or recognize parliamentary law as their rules of order and proceeding, courts ordinarily will not annul or invalidate an ordinance enacted in disregard of parliamentary rule, provided the enactment is made in the manner required by statute. The rules of parliamentary practice are merely procedural, and not substantive. South Ga. Power Co. v. Baumann, 169 Ga. 649, 151 S.E. 513 (1929) (decided under former law).

Racial and sexual quotas in contracts void. - City ordinance requiring that certain percentages of contracts be awarded on the basis of race and sex conflicts with the legislative intent and purpose embodied in the bid requirement in the city charter that contracts be awarded without favoritism to obtain reasonable quality at the lowest cost, and is therefore void. Georgia Branch, Associated Gen. Contractors of Am., Inc. v. City of Atlanta, 253 Ga. 397, 321 S.E.2d 325 (1984).

Provision for full-time fire department. - Proposed municipal charter amendment which would require provision of fire protection and that such fire protection be provided by a city fire department, with full-time, paid personnel, employed by the city, does not violate Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. III. Sadler v. Nijem, 251 Ga. 375, 306 S.E.2d 257 (1983).

Adoption of occupation tax on businesses within corporate limits was not authorized by O.C.G.A. Ch. 35, T. 36. City of Tunnel Hill v. Ridley, 183 Ga. App. 486, 359 S.E.2d 184, cert. denied, 183 Ga. App. 905, 359 S.E.2d 184 (1987).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, opinions prior to the enactment of this Code section are included in the annotations for this Code section.

City police officer may not arrest one for violation of city ordinances when the police officer is outside city limits. 1954-56 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 490 (decided under former law).

Amount of license fees or taxes. - Licensing power of a municipality is granted by the charter creating the municipality; the amount of license fees or taxes a municipality may levy on a particular business is not regulated by statute, but appellate courts have ruled that a municipal tax on an occupation must be reasonable. 1954-56 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 493 (decided under former law).

City may establish personnel department and merit board without the necessity of special Acts of the General Assembly. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-310.

Joint purchase of riot control equipment. - All counties and those municipalities having the requisite charter authority may enter into cooperative agreements with one another for the purchase and use of equipment to be employed in jointly administered riot control programs. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-141.

Governing authority of affected municipality or county has authority to control boxing events in the authority's jurisdiction. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-167.

Effect of failure of prior election on acts validly conducted. - Municipality may treat an election ordered as a result of the failure of a prior election as a continuation of that prior election, recognizing those acts validly conducted. 1976 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 76-23.

Change of election date. - Municipality is not empowered to amend a municipal charter by ordinance with respect to date of a municipal general election. 1977 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 77-33.

City has home rule power to amend a city's charter by ordinance so as to remove from the charter a limitation on the millage rate which the city may use in levying ad valorem taxes. 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U83-19.

Municipal home rule power not violated by World Congress Center's regulations. - O.C.G.A. § 10-9-14 empowering the Geo. L. Smith II Georgia World Congress Center Authority to regulate activities on the sidewalks and streets immediately adjacent to the World Congress Center's projects during an event period do not violate the City of Atlanta's home rule power under subsection (a) of O.C.G.A. § 36-35-3 or Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. III(c). 1994 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U94-4.

City authorized to charge rental fee to state. - City of Atlanta may charge the Board of Regents for permitting a fiber optic cable to lie under city owned streets based on city code provisions enacted pursuant to the city's home rule power. 1995 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 95-14.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 42 Am. Jur. 2d, Initiative and Referendum, §§ 6, 24 et seq., 33 et seq., 48. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 30 et seq., 90.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 30, 112 et seq., 385 et seq.

ALR. - Power of municipal councils to punish for contempt, 8 A.L.R. 1586.

Validity of municipal ordinance prohibiting or regulating keeping of livestock, 32 A.L.R. 1372; 40 A.L.R. 566.

Delegation by municipality of its powers as to building regulations, 43 A.L.R. 834; 46 A.L.R. 88.

Validity of statute or ordinance relating to place of sale of food, 52 A.L.R. 669.

Power to forbid or restrict repair of wooden building within fire limits, 56 A.L.R. 878.

Constitutionality of city manager or commission form of municipal government, 67 A.L.R. 737.

Power to include in municipal contract or proposal therefor, provisions designed to relieve local unemployment, or encourage local industries, 81 A.L.R. 255.

Implied power of municipality to operate nursery, quarry, gravel pit, or other sites for production of material needed for carrying out powers expressly conferred upon it, 104 A.L.R. 1342.

Matters pertaining to police department as within exclusive control of municipalities under home rule charters, 105 A.L.R. 259.

Home rule charter as affecting power of legislature in respect of municipal taxation, 106 A.L.R. 1202.

Validity, construction, and application of ordinances prohibiting or regulating "curb service," 111 A.L.R. 131.

Power of municipality to impose chain store license tax, 111 A.L.R. 596.

Statute relating to municipal fire departments as interference with local self-government, 141 A.L.R. 903.

Validity of municipal regulation of solicitation of magazine subscriptions, 9 A.L.R.2d 728.

Conclusiveness of declaration of emergency in ordinance, 35 A.L.R.2d 586.

What constitutes requisite majority of members of municipal council voting on issue, 43 A.L.R.2d 698.

Power of municipality or other governmental unit to make contract or covenant exempting or releasing property from special assessment, 47 A.L.R.2d 1185.

Municipal power as to billboards and outdoor advertising, 58 A.L.R.2d 1314.

Validity of municipal regulation of storage or accumulation of lumber, straw, trash, or similar inflammable material, 64 A.L.R.2d 1040.

Ordinance providing for suspension or revocation of state-issued driver's license as within municipal power, 92 A.L.R.2d 204.

Power of municipal corporation to enact civil rights ordinance, 93 A.L.R.2d 1028.

Validity of municipal ordinance regulating time during which restaurant business may be conducted, 53 A.L.R.3d 942.

Validity and construction of curfew statute, ordinance, or proclamation, 59 A.L.R.3d 321; 83 A.L.R.4th 1056.

Construction and application of ordinances relating to unrestrained dogs, cats, or other domesticated animals, 1 A.L.R.4th 994.

Power of municipal corporation to legislate as to Sunday observance, 10 A.L.R.4th 246.

Validity, construction, and effect of juvenile curfew regulations, 83 A.L.R.4th 1056.

36-35-4. Compensation and benefits for employees and members of governing authority; conditions and requirements governing increases for elective members of governing authority.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of each municipal corporation is authorized to fix the salary, compensation, and expenses of its municipal employees and the members of its municipal governing authority and to provide insurance, retirement, and pension benefits, coverage under federal old-age, survivors and disability programs, hospitalization benefits, and workers' compensation benefits for its employees, their dependents, and their survivors and for members of the municipal governing authority, their dependents, and their survivors, when such benefits are provided to municipal employees. Any previous actions to extend insurance, federal old-age, survivors and disability programs, retirement, hospitalization, and workers' compensation benefits to members of the municipal governing authority are validated. With the exception of the provision of insurance, federal old-age, survivors and disability programs, retirement, hospitalization, and workers' compensation benefits, any action to increase the salary or compensation of the elective members of the municipal governing authority shall be subject to the following conditions and requirements:

(1) Any such increase shall not be effective until after the taking of office of those elected at the next regular municipal election which is held immediately following the date on which the action to increase the compensation was taken;

(2) Such action shall not be taken during the period of time beginning with the date that candidates for election to membership on the municipal governing authority may first qualify as such candidates and ending with the date members of the municipal governing authority take office following their election; and

(3) Such action shall not be taken until notice of intent to take the action has been published in a newspaper of general circulation designated as the legal organ in the county and in the municipal corporation at least once a week for three consecutive weeks immediately preceding the week during which the action is taken.

(b) As used in subsection (a) of this Code section, the phrase "elective members of the municipal governing authority" means, notwithstanding any terminology or designation of a municipal governing authority or governing body contained in any municipal charter, any elective municipal official who exercises any executive or legislative or executive and legislative powers of the municipal corporation, specifically including a mayor, vice-mayor, president or chairman of a municipal council, member of a municipal council, member of a board of aldermen, or member of a board of commissioners. Such phrase shall also include any person who is appointed to fill a vacancy in any such elective office.

(c) As used in subsection (a) of this Code section, the words "salary or compensation," as applied to the elective members of a municipal governing authority, shall include any expense allowance or any form of payment or reimbursement of expenses, except reimbursement for expenses actually and necessarily incurred by members of a municipal governing authority in carrying out their official duties. The governing authority of each municipal corporation shall be authorized to provide by ordinance for the reimbursement of such actual and necessary expenses.

(d) As used in subsection (a) of this Code section, the words "retirement" and "pension" shall mean termination from municipal service with the right to receive a benefit based upon all or part of such municipal service in accordance with the terms of the ordinance or contract pursuant to which the municipality provides for payment of such benefits. The General Assembly declares and affirms that the Act approved April 17, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 1741) was intended to assure that prior advertisement of actions to provide insurance, federal old-age, survivors and disability programs, retirement, pension, hospitalization, and workers' compensation benefits to elected members of the municipal governing authority, their dependents, and their survivors is not required.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 298, § 5; Ga. L. 1973, p. 778, § 4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 195, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 28, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 645, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1741, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1055, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter)," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions prior to enactment of this Code section are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Mayor is not member of "municipal governing authority" and, therefore, the authority of the city council to increase the compensation paid to the office of the mayor is not subject to the strictures of this section. Savage v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 671, 251 S.E.2d 268 (1978).

Meaning of phrase "governing authority". - Generally accepted meaning of the phrase "governing authority" or "governing body," in reference to the operation of city or county governments, is a council or board performing legislative functions. Savage v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 671, 251 S.E.2d 268 (1978).

In determining whether municipal officer is part of governing authority of municipality, the question is whether that municipal officer possesses legislative power. Savage v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 671, 251 S.E.2d 268 (1978).

Fact that mayor of town is presiding officer of council and has power to cast tie-breaking votes does not make the mayor a member of council if the city charter provides that the mayor is not to be a member. Accordingly, even though the president of the city council is the presiding officer of the council and possesses the authority to cast tie-breaking votes, the mayor should not be considered a member of the council, since the city charter expressly provides that the mayor is not to be a member. Therefore, an increase in the mayor's compensation is not subject to this section. Savage v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 671, 251 S.E.2d 268 (1978).

City not authorized to pay mayor for services of city manager. - City is not authorized to pay to a city's mayor compensation, over and beyond the sum specified in the charter as the mayor's salary, for services ordinarily rendered by a city manager. Welsch v. Wilson, 217 Ga. 582, 124 S.E.2d 77 (1962) (decided under former law).

"Retirement benefits" construed. - Benefits provided under a city retirement plan are retirement benefits expressly exempted under subsection (a) of O.C.G.A. § 36-35-4 and not in the nature of a pension or gratuity when the retirement plan allows council members, after a given period of time, to terminate employment and receive partial credit for past years' service toward the total required time for entitlement to a monthly payment for life. Swann v. Board of Trustees, 257 Ga. 450, 360 S.E.2d 395 (1987).

City ordinance increasing pension plan contribution rate. - Trial court properly granted the city defendants summary judgment on the city employees' claims of breach of contract and unconstitutional impairment of contract regarding an ordinance increasing their pension plan contribution rate because the Georgia General Assembly expressly contemplated that a municipal corporation's provision for employee retirement or pension benefits would be subject to being supplemented by local law. Borders v. City of Atlanta, 298 Ga. 188, 779 S.E.2d 279 (2015).

No notice required prior to council's consideration of participation in retirement system. - City council is not required by statute to advertise notice of the council's intent to consider an ordinance extending participation in the Joint Municipal Employees Retirement System pension to the council's own members. City of Marietta v. Holland, 252 Ga. 299, 314 S.E.2d 97 (1984); Swann v. Board of Trustees, 257 Ga. 450, 360 S.E.2d 395 (1987).

Cited in King v. Herron, 241 Ga. 5, 243 S.E.2d 36 (1978).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Policy behind subsection (a) is to impose restrictions upon the powers of members of municipal governing authorities to increase their own salaries or compensation. 1980 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U80-27.

Subsection (a) does not prohibit increase from applying to whole council after next election when that election involves less than all positions on the governing authority. 1980 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U80-27.

City may set up retirement system for city employees without necessity of amending city charter. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-80.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 185, 202 et seq., 221 et seq., 226. 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 268 et seq., 279, 284.

Wrongful Termination of Retirement Benefits, 13 POF2d 531.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 473 et seq.

36-35-4.1. Reapportionment of election districts for municipal elections.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the limitations provided by this Code section, the governing authority of any municipal corporation is authorized to reapportion the election districts from which members of the municipal governing authority are elected following publication of the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census. Such reapportionment of districts shall be effective for the election of members to the municipal governing authority at the next regular general municipal election following the publication of the decennial census.

(b) The municipal governing authority shall by ordinance amend its charter pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 36-35-3 to reapportion the districts in accordance with the following specifications:

(1) Each reapportioned district shall be formed of contiguous territory; and the boundary lines of such district shall be the center lines of streets or other well-defined boundaries;

(2) Variations in population among such districts shall comply with the one person-one vote requirements of the United States Constitution; and

(3) The reapportionment shall be limited to adjusting the boundary lines of the existing districts only to the extent reasonably necessary to comply with the requirements of paragraph (2) of this subsection; and the number of members of the municipal governing body and the manner of electing such members, except for the adjustment of district boundary lines, shall not be changed by the municipal governing authority.

(c) In addition to reapportionment following publication of the decennial census, a municipal governing authority shall reapportion districts pursuant to this Code section if the annexation of additional territory to the corporate boundaries of the municipality has the effect of denying electors residing within the newly annexed territory the right to vote for members of the municipal governing authority on substantially the same basis as the other electors of the municipality vote for members of the municipal governing authority. The reapportionment provided for in this subsection shall meet the criteria specified in subsection (b) of this Code section and shall be further limited to making only those adjustments in district boundary lines as may be reasonably necessary to include the newly annexed territory within such districts. Reapportionment under this subsection shall be effective for the next regular general municipal election following the annexation.

(d) This Code section shall not prohibit the General Assembly from enacting a local law at any time to amend the charter of a municipality to reapportion or otherwise change election districts from which members of the municipal governing authority are elected. If such action is taken by the General Assembly following publication of a decennial census, but before the first regular general municipal election following the publication of such census, the local Act of the General Assembly shall nullify the power given to the municipal governing authority by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section to reapportion districts following publication of that decennial census. If such action is taken by the General Assembly in conjunction with the annexation, by local Act of the General Assembly, of additional territory to the corporate boundaries of the municipality, the local Act of the General Assembly shall nullify the power and duty given to the municipal governing authority by subsection (c) of this Code section to reapportion districts as a result of that annexation.

(e) In addition to reapportionment following publication of the decennial census, the governing authority of any municipal corporation with a population of 40,000 or more according to the latest United States decennial census is authorized not more than one time during the ten-year period between the publication of consecutive decennial censuses to reapportion or modify the election districts from which members of the municipal governing authority are elected; provided, however, that (1) no such reapportionment shall result in the redistricting of more than 600 persons, (2) no such reapportionment shall occur within 180 days of a general or special municipal election or primary, and (3) a map reflecting any changes and copies of any communications to or from the United States Department of Justice relating to such changes are furnished to the Secretary of State and the Legislative Reapportionment Office within 30 days after such change or communication. Such reapportionment of districts shall be effective for the election of one or more members to the municipal governing authority at the next regular general municipal election or special municipal election following such reapportionment.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 497, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 864, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 14 Am. Jur. 2d, Census, § 9. 25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, §§ 13 et seq., 23 et seq.

C.J.S. - 29 C.J.S., Elections, § 83.

36-35-5. Filing of charter amendments or revisions, notices, and affidavits; publication and distribution of amendments and revisions by Secretary of State.

Statute text

No amendment or revision of any charter made pursuant to this chapter shall become effective until a copy of the amendment or revision, a copy of the required notice of publication, and an affidavit of a duly authorized representative of the newspaper in which the notice was published, to the effect that the notice has been published as provided in this chapter, has been filed with the Secretary of State and in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county of the legal situs of the municipal corporation. The Secretary of State shall provide for the publication and distribution of all such amendments and revisions at least annually.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 298, § 6.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter)," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Mere failure to file ordinance does not make it ineffective charter amendment. - After many months of operation under the ordinance as adopted and filed in the office of the Secretary of State, mere failure to also file the completed ordinance in the office of the clerk of court does not make the ordinance an ineffective charter amendment. Jackson v. Fraternal Order of Police Lodge No. 8, 234 Ga. 906, 218 S.E.2d 633 (1975).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 293.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 351 et seq.

36-35-6. Limitations on home rule powers.

Statute text

(a) The power granted to municipal corporations in subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 36-35-3 shall not be construed to extend to the following matters or to any other matters which the General Assembly by general law has preempted or may hereafter preempt; but such matters shall be the subject of general law or the subject of local Acts of the General Assembly to the extent that the enactment of such local Acts is otherwise permitted under the Constitution:

(1) Action affecting the composition and form of the municipal governing authority, the procedure for election or appointment of the members thereof, and the continuance in office and limitation thereon for such members, except as authorized in Chapter 2 of Title 21 or as provided in Code Section 36-35-4.1;

(2) (A) Action defining any offense, which so defined, is also an offense under the criminal laws of Georgia;

(B) Action providing for confinement in excess of six months; and

(C) Action providing for fines and bond forfeitures in excess of $1,000.00;

(3) Action adopting any form of taxation beyond that authorized by law or by the Constitution;

(4) Action affecting the exercise of the power of eminent domain;

(5) Action expanding the power of regulation over any business activity regulated by the Public Service Commission beyond that authorized by charter or general law or by the Constitution;

(6) Action affecting the jurisdiction of any court; and

(7) Action changing charter provisions relating to the establishment and operations of an independent school system.

(b) The power granted in subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 36-35-3 shall not include the power to take any action affecting the private or civil law governing private or civil relationships, except as is incident to the exercise of an independent governmental power.

(c) Nothing in this Code section shall affect Code Sections 36-35-4 and 36-35-5.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 298, § 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 296, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1970, p. 346, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 778, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 497, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 468, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-32/HB 233.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter)," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004). For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Although the meaning of O.C.G.A. § 36-35-6 (b) is ambiguous, the statute indicates that the state does not wish to give our cities the power to enact a distinctive law of contract. City of Atlanta v. McKinney, 265 Ga. 161, 454 S.E.2d 517 (1995).

Cities without power to adopt new charters changing form of government. - Under Ga. Const. 1945, Art. XV, Sec. I, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. II), and this section, cities do not have the power to adopt entirely new charters changing a cities' form of government. Thus, a new charter created by a special law does not contravene Ga. Const. 1945, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV.), which forbids the legislature from adopting a special law covering a subject matter dealt with by an existing general law. Jackson v. Inman, 232 Ga. 566, 207 S.E.2d 475 (1974).

Fundamental and substantive changes in city government cannot be made by a municipality under general home rule laws. Bruck v. City of Temple, 240 Ga. 411, 240 S.E.2d 876 (1977).

General Assembly has reserved legislative power to enact new charters for existing cities when such charters include drastic changes in the composition and form of city government, and the election and terms of office of the members of the governing authority of cities. Bruck v. City of Temple, 240 Ga. 411, 240 S.E.2d 876 (1977).

Retention by General Assembly of power to extend municipal boundaries. - Existence of prior statutes permitting the enlargement of boundaries does not deprive the General Assembly of the power to alter and extend municipal boundaries without the consent of the persons affected thereby. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Constitutionality of local law extending municipal boundaries. - Local law extending municipal boundaries does not violate the constitutional guarantee of due process of the law because the law subjects property owners in the area annexed to taxation by the municipality; nor does the law deny to such property owners equal protection of the law within the meaning of U.S. Const., amend. 14. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Statute does not provide the sole method by which the General Assembly may amend the city charter so as to change city boundaries. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

There is no requirement, statutory or otherwise, that local annexation statute itself make provisions for myriad adjustments between the annexed territory and the municipality which the annexation necessitates. Bruck v. City of Temple, 240 Ga. 411, 240 S.E.2d 876 (1977).

Both county governments and municipalities may levy taxes for public purposes connected with administration of county and city governments; as a corollary to this principle, it follows that counties and municipalities may appropriate and expend money for such public purpose. Peacock v. Georgia Mun. Ass'n, 247 Ga. 740, 279 S.E.2d 434 (1981).

Statute prohibiting wrecker service from refusing checks and credit cards constitutional. - City code section which made it unlawful for a wrecker service to refuse to accept checks and major credit cards is constitutional, and is not ultra vires under the home rule powers conferred by subsection (a) of O.C.G.A. § 36-35-6. Upton v. City of Atlanta, 260 Ga. 250, 392 S.E.2d 244 (1990).

Municipal court not improperly divested of jurisdiction. - Establishment by a city council of the Atlanta, Georgia, Bureau of Taxicabs and Vehicles for Hire, and the authorization of an administrative hearing procedure for the enforcement of the regulation of taxicabs was not an ultra vires act because it did not improperly divest the municipal court of jurisdiction to hear such cases under O.C.G.A. § 36-35-6(a)(6); the provisions of the city charter were consistent with the concept of concurrent jurisdiction, and the city had the power to regulate and license vehicles for hire and to create boards and commissions under the city charter. Atlanta Taxicab Co. Owners Ass'n v. City of Atlanta, 281 Ga. 342, 638 S.E.2d 307 (2006).

Cited in Dodson v. Graham, 462 F.2d 144 (5th Cir. 1972); State v. Golia, 235 Ga. 791, 222 S.E.2d 27 (1976); Lambert v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 645, 250 S.E.2d 456 (1978); Savage v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 671, 251 S.E.2d 268 (1978); Porter v. City of Atlanta, 259 Ga. 526, 384 S.E.2d 631 (1989).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Ordinances creating status of domestic partnership. - Municipal ordinances which create the status of domestic partnership are violative of constitutional and statutory provisions precluding municipal legislation relating to legal status and relationship; thus, group health insurance coverage provided pursuant to such ordinances is violative of the public policy of this state. 1993 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 93-26.

City has home rule power to amend a city's charter by ordinance so as to remove from the charter a limitation on the millage rate which the city may use in levying ad valorem taxes. 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U83-19.

City may amend a city's charter by resolution to increase the fines and imprisonment which may be imposed by a recorders court for violations of city ordinances. 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U83-20.

Adding residency requirement for election to governing authority. - Municipality may not under the municipality's home rule powers amend the municipality's charter to impose a residency requirement for election to the municipal governing authority. 1985 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 85-45.

Date of municipal election may not be altered by municipality. - Date of a municipal general election constitutes an integral aspect of the procedure for election for members of the municipal governing authority, and thus may not be altered by the municipality. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 75-140.

Municipality is not empowered, by virtue of former § 21-3-51, to amend its charter by ordinance with respect to the date of the municipality's municipal general election. 1977 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 77-33.

Effect of failure of prior election on acts validly conducted. - Municipality may treat an election ordered as a result of the failure of a prior election as a continuation of that prior election, recognizing those acts validly conducted. 1976 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 76-23.

No city acting under this chapter could alter court having jurisdiction over state offenses. 1971 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U71-30.

Garbage collection fee would not violate this section. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U70-192.

Limit on fine or forfeiture - O.C.G.A. § 36-35-6 expressly precludes a municipality from providing by either ordinance or charter amendment for a fine or forfeiture in excess of $1,000. 1999 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U99-11.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 20 Am. Jur. 2d, Courts, § 14. 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 111 et seq., 124 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 157, 195 et seq., 244, 245.

ALR. - Certificates by state authorizing operation of motorbus lines over section of highway as affected by its subsequent annexation to city, 154 A.L.R. 1440.

36-35-6.1. Signs for privately owned businesses.

Statute text

A municipality shall be prohibited from restricting the use of any language other than English on signs for privately owned businesses. This Code section shall not restrict the municipality's right to enact any other restrictions on signs.

History

(Code 1981, § 41-1-10, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1196, § 5.1; Code 1981, § 36-35-6.1, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 41.)

Annotations

Cross references. - English designated as official language, § 50-3-100.

Editor's notes. - By resolution (Ga. L. 1986, p. 529), the General Assembly designated the English language as the official language of the State of Georgia.

36-35-7. Provisions of chapter general law; enactment of local or special laws on subject matters covered by chapter; effect of chapter upon amendment of municipal charters.

Statute text
